California, session 20252026, AB2548.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 200 of the Labor Code is amended to read:200. As used in For purposes of this article: (a)(a) “Wages” includes all amounts for labor performed by employees of every description, whether the amount is fixed or ascertained by the standard of time, task, piece, commission basis, or other method of calculation.(b) “Labor” includes labor, work, or service whether rendered or performed under contract, subcontract, partnership, station plan, or other agreement if the labor to be paid for is performed personally by the person demanding payment.